Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4552.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 1969, chapter 193, section 3, as amended by Laws 1974, chapter 235, section 1, and Laws 1980, chapter 371, section 1, is amended to read: Sec. 3. INDEPENDENT SCHOOL DISTRICT NO. 535; ELECTIONS. deleted text begin Election districts may at any time be established in the manner provided by this act or the board of education of the district may by resolution at any time provide that the board members be elected at large. If the members are elected at large the notice of election should include substantially the following form: deleted text end deleted text begin "Position number 3 and Position number 5 are to be filled by election. Candidates may not file for more than one position." deleted text end deleted text begin If the members are elected at large the ballots shall read as follows: deleted text end deleted text begin "For school board position number 3 of Independent School District Number 535" or "For school board position number 5 of Independent School District Number 535." deleted text end deleted text begin The names of the candidates for each seat shall be rotated on the ballots to avoid any appearance of preference for incumbents, and incumbency shall not be indicated on the ballot. deleted text end deleted text begin Newly elected school board members shall take office at the next regularly scheduled meeting of the board following receipt of their certificates of election and notwithstanding section 123.34, subdivision 1, the board may organize at that meeting rather than at the time required by section 123.34, subdivision 1. If the school district changes from election by district to election at large or from election at large to election by district incumbents shall serve the entire terms to which they were elected under the prior system. If the school district changes from election by district to election at large incumbents shall be assigned by lot to the numbered positions. deleted text end new text begin School board elections for Independent School District No. 535, Rochester, shall be conducted in accordance with Minnesota Statutes, chapter 205A, including but not limited to provisions relating to district organization. School board membership shall be governed by Minnesota Statutes, section 123B.09. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin SPECIAL LAW.new text end new text begin Section 1 is a special law enacted pursuant to the Minnesota Constitution, article XII, section 2, and applies to Independent School District No. 535, Rochester. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin Section 1 is effective upon approval by the governing body of Independent School District No. 535 and compliance with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021, subdivisions 2 and 3, for school district elections held after completion of local approval. The local approval process must be completed by June 30, 2026, to apply to 2026 school district elections. new text end